Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 12. Merger, Consolidation, and Conversion.

Sec. 10.50.500.
Authority for merger or consolidation.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, and subject to the law applicable to the other limited liability company, a limited liability company may merge or consolidate with or into a limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.505.
Exchange and conversion of rights and interests. [Repealed, § 29 ch 60 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 10.50.510.
Approval or abandonment of merger or consolidation.

Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement of the company, a limited liability company may not approve a proposed merger or consolidation unless the merger or consolidation is approved by all of the members of the company.

A foreign limited liability company that is a party to a proposed merger or consolidation may not approve the merger or consolidation unless the merger or consolidation is approved in the manner and by the vote required by the law applicable to the foreign limited liability company.

A party to a merger or consolidation under this chapter may abandon the merger or consolidation as provided in the merger or consolidation agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.515.
Filing of articles of merger or consolidation.

The limited liability company that survives or results from a merger or consolidation under this chapter shall file with the department articles of merger or consolidation signed by each limited liability company that is a party to the merger or consolidation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.520.
Contents of articles of merger or consolidation.

The articles of merger or consolidation required by AS

10.50.515

must state

the name of each limited liability company that is a party to the merger or consolidation;

the jurisdiction where each limited liability company that is a party to the merger or consolidation was organized;

that an agreement of merger or consolidation has been approved and signed by each limited liability company that is a party to the merger or consolidation;

the name of the surviving or resulting limited liability company;

the future effective date, which must be a specific date, of the merger or consolidation if the merger or consolidation is not effective when the articles are filed;

that the agreement of merger or consolidation is on file at an office of the surviving or resulting limited liability company and the address of the office;

that a copy of the agreement of merger or consolidation will be furnished by the surviving or resulting limited liability company on request and without cost to a person holding an interest in a limited liability company that is a party to the merger or consolidation;

if the surviving or resulting limited liability company is not organized under the laws of this state, a statement that the surviving or resulting limited liability company

agrees that it may be served with process in this state in a proceeding to enforce an obligation of a company that is a party to the merger or consolidation and that was organized under the laws of this state, and to enforce an obligation of the surviving or resulting company;

appoints the department as its agent for service of process in an enforcement proceeding under (A) of this paragraph; and

the address to which a copy of the process may be mailed to the surviving or resulting company by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.525.
Execution of articles of merger or consolidation.

Articles of merger or consolidation shall be signed by a limited liability company that is a party to the merger or consolidation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.530.
Equivalent to articles of dissolution.

Articles of merger or consolidation constitute articles of dissolution for a limited liability company that is not the surviving or resulting limited liability company in the merger or consolidation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.535.
Effective date of merger or consolidation.

A merger or consolidation under AS

10.50.500

—

10.50.565

takes effect upon the later of the effective date of the filing of the articles of merger or consolidation or an effective date stated in the articles of merger or consolidation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.540.
Use of merger or consolidation agreement to amend or adopt operating agreement.

An agreement of merger or consolidation approved under AS

10.50.510

may amend an operating agreement of a limited liability company or adopt a new operating agreement for the company if the company is the surviving or resulting limited liability company in the merger or consolidation.

An approved agreement of merger or consolidation may provide that the operating agreement of a limited liability company that is a party to the merger or consolidation, including a limited liability company organized for the purpose of consummating a merger or consolidation, is the operating agreement of a limited liability company that is the surviving or resulting limited liability company.

An amendment to an operating agreement or the adoption of a new operating agreement under this section is effective when the merger or consolidation is effective.

This subsection is not intended to limit the accomplishment of a merger or of a matter referred to in this section by other means provided for in an operating agreement or in another agreement or as otherwise permitted by law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.545.
General effects of merger or consolidation.

When a merger or consolidation becomes effective, the limited liability companies that are parties to a merger or consolidation agreement become a single limited liability company that, in the case of a merger, is the limited liability company named in the plan of merger as the surviving limited liability company, and, in the case of a consolidation, is the limited liability company named in the plan of consolidation as the resulting limited liability company.

When a merger or consolidation becomes effective, a limited liability company that is a party to the merger or consolidation agreement and that is not the surviving or resulting limited liability company ceases to exist.

The surviving limited liability company of a merger or the limited liability company resulting from a consolidation possesses all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers of each limited liability company that is a party to the merger or consolidation agreement and is subject to all the restrictions, disabilities, and duties of each limited liability company that is a party to the merger or consolidation to the extent the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, franchises, restrictions, disabilities, and duties apply to the type of limited liability company that is the surviving limited liability company or the resulting limited liability company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.550.
Effect of merger or consolidation on property of companies.

The real and personal property, the debts due, including promises to make capital contributions, other choses in action, and the other interests of the limited liability companies that are parties to a merger or consolidation belong to the surviving or resulting limited liability company without further action by the companies.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.555.
Effect of merger or consolidation on liabilities and proceedings.

The surviving or resulting limited liability company in a merger or consolidation is liable for the liabilities of the limited liability companies that are parties to the merger or consolidation.

A claim, action, or other proceeding that exists at the time of the merger or consolidation and that is pending by or against a limited liability company that is a party to a merger or consolidation may be pursued as if the merger or consolidation had not taken place, or the surviving or resulting limited liability company may be substituted in the claim, action, or other proceeding.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.560.
Rights of creditors and liens.

The rights of creditors and liens on the property of a limited liability company that is a party to a merger or consolidation are not impaired by the merger or consolidation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.565.
Conversion or exchange of interests at merger or consolidation.

Upon a merger or consolidation, the limited liability company interests that are to be converted or exchanged into interests, cash, obligations, or other property under the terms of a merger or consolidation agreement are converted as provided by the merger or consolidation agreement.

Upon a merger or consolidation, the former holders of interests converted under (a) of this section have the rights provided in the merger or consolidation agreement or otherwise provided by law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.570.
Conversion to limited liability company. [Repealed, § 29 ch 60 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 10.50.580.
Other transactions.

Under AS 10.55 (Alaska Entity Transactions Act), a limited liability company may enter into mergers, interest exchanges, conversions, and domestications that are not covered by AS

10.50.500

—

10.50.565

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 32, ch. 60, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts, this section does not affect an action or proceeding begun or right accrued before July 1, 2014.

Sec. 10.50.590.
Definition.

In AS

10.50.500

—

10.50.590

, “limited liability company” means a limited liability company organized under this chapter or a foreign limited liability company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)